Utah statutes.
31A-23a-113.   License lapse and voluntary surrender.

(1) (a)  A license issued under this chapter shall lapse if the licensee fails to:

(i)  pay when due a fee under Section 31A-3-103;

(ii)  complete continuing education requirements under Section 31A-23a-202 before submitting the license renewal application;

(iii)  submit a completed renewal application as required by Section 31A-23a-104;

(iv)  submit additional documentation required to complete the licensing process as related to a specific license type or line of authority; or

(v)  maintain an active license in a resident state if the licensee is a nonresident licensee.

(b) (i)  A licensee whose license lapses due to the following may request an action described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii):

(A)  military service;

(B)  voluntary service for a period of time designated by the person for whom the licensee provides voluntary service; or

(C)  some other extenuating circumstances, such as long-term medical disability.

(ii)  A licensee described in Subsection (1)(b)(i) may request:

(A)  reinstatement of the license no later than one year after the day on which the license lapses; and

(B)  waiver of any of the following imposed for failure to comply with renewal procedures:

(I)  an examination requirement;

(II)  reinstatement fees set under Section 31A-3-103;

(III)  continuing education requirements; or

(IV)  other sanction imposed for failure to comply with renewal procedures.

(2)  If a license issued under this chapter is voluntarily surrendered, the license or line of authority may be reinstated:

(a)  during the license period in which the license is voluntarily surrendered; and

(b)  no later than one year after the day on which the license is voluntarily surrendered.

(3)  A voluntarily surrendered license that is reinstated during the license period set forth in Subsection (2) may not be reinstated until the person who voluntarily surrendered the license complies with any applicable continuing education requirements for the period during which the license was voluntarily surrendered.

